Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5262.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. For the purposes of all acts of the this state relative to veterans: , "veteran" (a) "Veteran" means an individual who served in the United States Armed Forces, including the reserve components, and was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable. Veteran includes an individual who died while on active duty in the United States Armed Forces. (b) "Veteran of the uniformed services" means an individual who served as a commissioned officer in the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Commissioned Officer Corps or the Public Health Service Commissioned Corps, who qualifies as a veteran under 38 USC 101 to 8528, and who was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable. Veteran of the uniformed services includes an individual who died while on active duty in the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Commissioned Officer Corps or the Public Health Service Commissioned Corps.